Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-730
Fugitives from justice; Governor; duty.

Subject to the provisions of sections 29-729 to 29-758, the provisions of the Constitution of the United States controlling, and any and all acts of Congress enacted in pursuance thereof, it is the duty of the Governor of this state to have arrested and delivered up to the Executive Authority of any other state of the United States any person charged in that state with treason, felony, or other crime, who has fled from justice and is found in this state.

Laws 1963, c. 159, § 2, p. 559.

A misstatement as to a petitioner's status as a fugitive in the extradition documents did not afford petitioner his right under the Uniform Criminal Extradition Act to have the question of whether he should be extradited from the asylum state properly determined by the governor of that state and, therefore, requires that he be dismissed from custody. Koenig v. Poskochil, 238 Neb. 118, 469 N.W.2d 523 (1991).

Allegation of delayed trial by the demanding state held invalid reason for refusing extradition. Wise v. State, 197 Neb. 831, 251 N.W.2d 373 (1977).

Where one is arrested on demand for extradition, he is not entitled to discharge when demanding state fails to assume custody within thirty days when delay is due to proceedings instituted by him. Prettyman v. Karnopp, 192 Neb. 451, 222 N.W.2d 362 (1974).